Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 1. General Provisions.

§79-10-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Professional Corporation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

Mississippi Limited Liability Company Act, see §§ 79-29-101 et seq.

Foreign limited liability companies, see §§ 79-29-1001 et seq.

§79-10-3.
Application of Mississippi Business Corporation Act.

The Mississippi Business Corporation Act applies to professional corporations, both domestic and foreign, to the extent not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

Although the shareholders did not ratify the president’s act of terminating an attorney’s position as an employee until more than a year after the fact, the action was invalidated by the lack of yearly meeting under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-7.01 which applied to the corporation by Miss. Code Ann. § 79-10-3. Jowett v. Scruggs, 901 So. 2d 638, 2004 Miss. App. LEXIS 768 (Miss. Ct. App. 2004), cert. denied, 901 So. 2d 1273, 2005 Miss. LEXIS 312 (Miss. 2005).

§79-10-4.
Uniform Partnership Act inapplicable to professional corporations.

Professional corporations are not subject to the provisions of the Uniform Partnership Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

Mississippi Uniform Partnership Act, see §§ 79-13-101 et seq.

§79-10-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Disqualified person” means an individual, general partnership, professional corporation or other entity that for any reason is or becomes ineligible under this chapter to be issued shares by a professional corporation.

“Domestic professional corporation” means a professional corporation.

“Foreign professional corporation” means a corporation or association for profit incorporated for the purpose of rendering professional services under a law other than the law of this state.

“Law” includes rules promulgated in accordance with Section 79-10-103.

“Licensing authority” means the office, board, agency, court or other authority in this state empowered to license or otherwise authorize the rendition of a professional service.

“Professional corporation” means a corporation for profit, other than a foreign professional corporation, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

“Professional service” means a service that may be lawfully rendered only by a person licensed or otherwise authorized by a licensing authority in this state to render the service, including, without limitation, certified public accountants, dentists, architects, veterinarians, osteopaths, physicians, surgeons and attorneys-at-law.

“Qualified person” means an individual, general partnership, professional corporation or other entity that is eligible under this chapter to be issued shares by a professional corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1995.